Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Probate Code of 1949, see Commentaries Volume B.

Cross References. Powers of fiduciary, inclusion in trust instrument by reference, §28-69-301 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1957, No. 29, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the purpose of having official documents served or transmitted by registered mail is to establish proof of mailing and delivery through the system of receipts provided for such mail; and

“Whereas, the Postmaster General has recently established the certified mail service which provides a cheaper means for the transmission of such documents and at the same time provides a system of receipts to prove mailing and delivery….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

28-1-101. Title.

This act may be cited as the “Probate Code”.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2001.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1949, No. 140, codified as §§28-1-101 —28-1-104,28-1-106,28-1-108 —28-1-113,28-1-115,28-1-116,28-24-101,28-24-102,28-25-101 —28-25-105,28-25-108 —28-25-110,28-26-101 —28-26-105,28-39-101,28-39-105,28-39-401 —28-39-407,28-40-101 —28-40-123,28-41-101 —28-41-104,28-42-101 —28-42-109,28-48-101 —28-48-105,28-48-107 —28-48-109,28-48-201 —28-48-209,28-48-301 —28-48-305,28-49-101 —28-49-117,28-50-101 —28-50-114,28-51-101 —28-51-109,28-51-201 —28-51-203,28-51-301 —28-51-309,28-52-101 —28-52-110,28-53-101 —28-53-109, and28-53-111 —28-53-119.

28-1-102. Definitions.

As used in the Probate Code:

“Child” denotes a natural or adopted child, but does not include a grandchild or other more remote descendant or an illegitimate child except such as would inherit under the law of descent and distribution;

“Claims” includes liabilities of the decedent which survive, whether arising in contract or tort or otherwise, funeral expenses, the cost of a tombstone, expenses of administration, and estate and inheritance taxes;

“County”, as applied to counties having more than one (1) district, means “district” unless the sense in which it is used or the applicable law indicates otherwise;

“Devise”, when used as a noun, means disposition of real or personal property, or both, by will.

“Devise”, when used as a verb, means to dispose of real or personal property, or both, by will;

“Devisee” includes legatee;

“Distributee” denotes a person entitled to real or personal property of a decedent, either by will, as an heir, or as a surviving spouse;

“Estate” denotes the real and personal property of the decedent or ward as from time to time changed in form by sale, reinvestment, or otherwise and as augmented by any accretions and additions and substitutions and diminished by any decreases and distributions;

“Fiduciary” includes personal representative, guardian, and testamentary trustee;

“Foreign personal representative” means a personal representative serving under appointment made by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia;

“Heir” denotes a person entitled by the law of descent and distribution to the real and personal property of an intestate decedent, but does not include a surviving spouse;

“Interested persons” includes any heir, devisee, spouse, creditor, or any other having a property right, interest in, or claim against the estate being administered, and a fiduciary;

“Lease” includes an oil, gas, or mineral lease;

“Legacy” means a disposition of personal property by will;

“Legatee” means a person entitled by will to personal property;

“Letters” includes letters testamentary, of administration, and of guardianship;

“Mortgage” includes deed of trust and vendor's lien;

“Net estate” refers to the real and personal property of a decedent exclusive of homestead rights, dower, family allowances, and enforceable claims against the estate;

“Person” includes a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity;

“Personal representative” means an executor or administrator.

However, for purposes of obtaining autopsy results that are in the medical records, the personal representative is the first of the following individuals or category of individuals who exists when the request for a copy of the autopsy results maintained in the medical records is made:

The executor or administrator;

The decedent's spouse;

A parent of the decedent; or

An adult child of the decedent; and

“Will” includes codicil.

As used in the Probate Code:

The singular includes the plural, and the plural includes the singular; and

The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (19)(B).

The General Assembly did not intend for a grandchild to be defined as a child under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

Because there is no comma separating “illegitimate child” and the modifier “except such as would inherit under the law of descent and distribution” in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the General Assembly intended for “except such as would inherit…” to modify only “illegitimate children.” McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

The phrase “except such as would inherit under the law of descent and distribution” in subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not modify the word “grandchild.” McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

The minor grandchildren of a decedent who would inherit from the decedent under the laws of descent and distribution do not have homestead rights under §28-39-201, because they do not fall within the definition of “child” in subdivision (a)(1) of this section. McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

Decedent's illegitimate, pretermitted child was not entitled to inherit from decedent as he was required to meet requirements of §28-39-407(b), subdivision (a)(1) of this section, and the six requirements of §28-9-209(d), but he failed to show that he had been recognized by the decedent or by a court and he failed to file his action within 180 days of decedent's death.Shelton v. Keathley, 367 Ark. 568, 242 S.W.3d 223 (2006).

Definition of word “claims” used in Probate Code to include estate taxes applies to “claims” only as it is used in Probate Code and has nothing to do with the apportionment of estate taxes. Williamson v. Williamson, 224 Ark. 141, 272 S.W.2d 72 (Ark. 1954).

Where a lawsuit pending in a circuit court was not a claim against the estate, but was a suit against the executor individually, the court did not err in closing the estate since there was no pending claim against the estate as defined by subdivision (2) of this section. Bostic v. Bostic Estate, 281 Ark. 167, 662 S.W.2d 815 (1984).

Both the widow and heirs at law are distributees of a solvent intestate estate under this section and §28-53-113 and therefore secured debts are to be discharged out of the general estate, unpledged personal property, where the creditor does not pursue the security which gives the widow a dower right in the entire security free from the debt. Wilcox v. Brewer, 224 Ark. 546, 274 S.W.2d 777 (1955).

Where administrator is removed for failure to qualify and physical incapacity, it is unnecessary for the court to determine whether person bringing matter to court's attention was an interested party. Davis v. Adams, 231 Ark. 197, 328 S.W.2d 851 (1959).

Since, under §28-25-102, an attesting witness to be “interested” must receive a beneficial interest by way of devise, an attorney signing will as attesting witness was not “interested,” although the firm with which he was associated was named to represent the estate. Rosenbaum v. Cahn, 234 Ark. 290, 351 S.W.2d 857 (1961).

One claiming damages for the alleged negligence of the decedent is not an interested person within the definition of this section. Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970).

Where plaintiffs filed an action against the administrator prior to his resignation as administrator, plaintiffs were “interested parties” within the meaning of this section and “aggrieved parties” within the meaning of §28-1-116 for purposes of appealing from probate orders that affected those proceedings. However, as such a resignation is ordinarily a matter of discretion for the probate judge and in this case had no effect on venue and §28-48-107 gives plaintiffs a remedy for the appointment of another administrator, there was no abuse of discretion in allowing the resignation to stand. Barkley v. Cullum, 252 Ark. 474, 479 S.W.2d 535 (1972).

Once a trial judge rejects the report on the public sale of estate land, the status of the parties who had bid for the land can no longer be described as interested parties; at best, their position is that of potential bidders at any future sale, and hence they have no standing to contest a petition on behalf of the heirs of an estate. Estate of Hodges v. Wilkie, 14 Ark. App. 297, 688 S.W.2d 307 (1985).

Where the decedent died testate and left them nothing under the will, the decedent's surviving children were not heirs and were not creditors, and were thus not “interested persons” as that term is used in subdivision (a)(11) of this section, §28-48-105(a)(2), or §28-48-107(a). Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

On petition to probate court to set aside order authorizing sale of decedent's land, where petitioners were not heirs or creditors, where their petition did not assert any claim against the estate or declare any interest in the estate's property, and where they did not indicate any entitlement to proceeds which might be distributed by the estate, but in fact were persons against whom the estate had sought relief, the petitioners were not interested persons as defined by subdivision (a)(11) and had no standing to question the issuance of the court's order. White v. Welsh, 323 Ark. 479, 915 S.W.2d 274 (1996).

Appellant was an “interested person” as defined in subdivision (a)(11) where appellant was specifically named in the will as a beneficiary of a trust; the fact that appellant was a beneficiary of the trust meant that appellant had “an interest in the estate.” Spicer v. Estate of Spicer, 55 Ark. App. 267, 935 S.W.2d 576 (1996).

Appellants were interested persons entitled to seek removal of an estate's personal representative where they were potential heirs of the intestate estate. Snowden v. Riggins, 70 Ark. App. 1, 13 S.W.3d 598 (2000).

Although appellant argued that there was no evidence that anyone received notice of the hearing set on the final accounting, which appellant claimed violated §28-1-112, the argument was without merit, given the notices that the trial court sent out after excluding appellant from distribution of the estate, and appellant conceded to having received actual notice in any event and possibly not having been entitled to notice in the first place; because appellant had been excluded, she was not an interested person under subdivision (11) of this section and so there was no legal requirement that she be served notice, and she lacked standing to complain about the failure to send notice to others who had not appealed.Seymour v. Biehslich, 371 Ark. 359, 266 S.W.3d 722 (2007).

Appellee was not an “interested person” as defined in subdivision (a)(11) of this section with standing to petition the probate court. Appellee failed to offer any testimony that there was a service contract between the decedent and herself, and there was no evidence that the services she provided for the decedent were of any extraordinary character.Lucas v. Wilson, 2011 Ark. App. 584, 385 S.W.3d 891 (2011).

Because appellant, an heir of the decedent and devisee under the will, was made a party to the probate action when the circuit court granted his motion to intervene under Ark. R. Civ. P. 24, the circuit court erred by determining that he was not entitled to notice of a hearing on a motion to remove the estate executrix. The Court of Appeals of Arkansas held that appellant was an “interested person” as defined in subdivision (11) of this section.Maxwell v. Estate of Maxwell, 2012 Ark. App. 174 (2012).

Probate court erred in finding that the limited liability company lacked standing to bring a petition for the determination of heirship, because the limited liability company alleged in the petition that it was a legal entity, so it was a person and could bring the petition; “person” was defined under subdivision (18) of this section to include a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.McVesting, LLC v. Heirs of Macie McGoon, 2012 Ark. App. 541 (2012).

The term “personal representative” includes both general and special administrators. Nickles v. Wood, 221 Ark. 630, 255 S.W.2d 433 (1953).

While a prosecuting attorney clearly has a duty to disclose all pertinent test on tangible items pursuant to ARCrP 17.1, the prosecutor is not required to make certain scientific tests on all materials seized. State v. Pulaski County Circuit Court, 316 Ark. 514, 872 S.W.2d 414 (1994).

Cited: Holt v. Moody, 234 Ark. 245, 352 S.W.2d 87 (1961); Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970); Sutton v. Milburn, 289 Ark. 421, 711 S.W.2d 808 (1986); Sanders v. Ryles, 318 Ark. 418, 885 S.W.2d 888 (1994); Dunklin v. Ramsay, 328 Ark. 263, 944 S.W.2d 76 (1997); Tatro v. Langston, 328 Ark. 548, 944 S.W.2d 118 (Ark. 1997); Barrera v. Vanpelt, 332 Ark. 482, 965 S.W.2d 780 (1998).

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

The probate of a will which, together with necessary proof of its execution, had been filed with the probate clerk in 1947, but which the clerk had failed to enter an order admitting to probate came within the exceptions of this section, and §28-40-103 limiting the time for probate did not apply. Muldrew v. Dodson, 237 Ark. 852, 376 S.W.2d 672 (1964).

Proceeding in 1950 to probate will of person who died in 1935 was not barred by five-year limitation period contained in 1949 Code, since Probate Code is not retroactive. Hudson v. Hudson, 219 Ark. 211, 242 S.W.2d 154 (1951).

This section is not retroactive, and therefore a probate court was not authorized to hear a petition to set aside prior order of probate court disposing of estate in 1943 on grounds that petitioner was actual heir since only the circuit or chancery courts could determine questions of heirship at that time. Adams v. Hart, 228 Ark. 687, 309 S.W.2d 719 (1958).

Cited: Mosely v. Mosely, 217 Ark. 536, 231 S.W.2d 99, 18 A.L.R.2d 695 (1950).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2003; Acts 2011, No. 722, § 1.

28-1-103. Effect of code.

Effective Date.The Probate Code shall take effect on July 1, 1949, except that, when its application, or parts thereof, would not be feasible or would work injustice in particular proceedings then pending, the former procedure shall apply.

Rights Not Affected.Acts done and rights accrued prior to July 1, 1949, shall not be affected or impaired by its provisions. When a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced to run by the provision of any statute in force before the Probate Code takes effect, the provision shall remain in force and be deemed a part of the Probate Code with respect to such a right.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2002.

28-1-104. Probate proceedings.

The circuit court shall have jurisdiction over:

The administration, settlement, and distribution of estates of decedents;

The probate of wills;

The persons and estates of minors;

Persons of unsound mind and their estates;

The determination of heirship or of adoption;

The restoration of lost wills and the construction of wills when incident to the administration of an estate; and

All such other matters as are provided by law.

Ark. L. Rev.

Minimum Standards of Judicial Administration — Arkansas, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 1, 22.

Amendments of the Probate Code, 7 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Conflict of Laws: Arkansas 1969-72, 27 Ark. L. Rev. 27.

The probate court is vested with both inherent and statutory authority to close adoption records; a writ of prohibition will not lie to prevent a probate court from sealing adoption records. Dougan v. Gray, 318 Ark. 6, 884 S.W.2d 239 (1994).

For purposes of §9-9-212, appellants claimed that the failure to file a home study for the adoption of the child was jurisdictional and required reversal; however, under subdivision (5) of this section, the trial court had jurisdiction to determine the child's adoption and any error in relying on appellees’ home study had to be raised in the trial court to be preserved for review.Wilson v. Golen, 2013 Ark. App. 267, 427 S.W.3d 723 (2013).

A probate court has authority, on a proper showing, to set aside any order that it makes at the same term of court. Knight v. Worthen Bank & Trust Co., 233 Ark. 465, 345 S.W.2d 361 (1961).

In order to establish lost will, probate court must follow dictates of this section. Conkle v. Walker, 294 Ark. 222, 742 S.W.2d 892 (1988).

Chancery courts could interfere in guardians' settlements to correct fraud, or relieve against accident, or upon some other acknowledged ground of equity jurisdiction. Nelson v. Cowling, 77 Ark. 351, 91 S.W. 773 (1906) (decision under prior law).

A chancery court has no jurisdiction to probate wills or settle and distribute a decedent's estate even though a will has not been probated nor letters of administration issued. Gaylor v. Gaylor, 224 Ark. 644, 275 S.W.2d 644 (1955).

The distribution of assets contained in a deceased husband's testamentary marital trust need not pass through the wife's estate; the probate court acted properly by deferring the trust and distribution issues to the chancery court. Clement v. Larkey, 314 Ark. 488A, 314 Ark. 498, 863 S.W.2d 578 (1993).

It was not error for the probate court to grant the petition of administrator to grant a lien upon decedent's real estate and to revive a judgment allowing claims, as §28-50-105 specifically permits an order allowing claims against an estate the effect of a judgment, and this section gives the probate court the same powers to carry out its judgments as exist in courts of general equity. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

While a probate court is not the proper forum to enforce contractual rights, where a contract provided for completion after close of administration and no action was being taken to close estate, it was proper to bring proceedings in the probate court to obtain a closing of the estate. Davis v. Adams, 231 Ark. 197, 328 S.W.2d 851 (1959).

In collateral proceeding attacking judgment of a probate court, every fact necessary to give the court jurisdiction will be conclusively presumed in favor of jurisdiction where the record is silent. Redditt v. Hale, 199 F.2d 386 (8th Cir. 1952), cert. denied, 345 U.S. 908, 73 S. Ct. 647 (1953).

The judgment of a probate court approving accounts of resident guardian of nonresident incompetents could not be attacked in collateral proceeding in federal district court where no fraud was charged, but only that resident guardian had not realized as much as should have been realized. Redditt v. Hale, 199 F.2d 386 (8th Cir. 1952), cert. denied, 345 U.S. 908, 73 S. Ct. 647 (1953).

When a probate court has acted within its jurisdiction, its judgments are not open to collateral attack. When a probate court acts without its jurisdiction, however, its judgments are void and subject to collateral attack. Filk v. Beatty, 298 Ark. 40, 764 S.W.2d 454 (1989).

A judgment cannot be collaterally attacked unless it is void on the face of the record or the probate court is shown to have lacked subject-matter jurisdiction. Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

A probate court had jurisdiction in matters of dower. Carter v. Younger, 112 Ark. 483, 166 S.W. 547 (1914) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to enforce a compromise of a ward's claim against an insurance company, such jurisdiction being in the circuit court. Union Cent. Life Ins. Co. v. Boggs, 188 Ark. 604, 66 S.W.2d 1077 (1934) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts were held to be without jurisdiction to confer equitable relief; however in probate matters properly brought before them they could apply equitable doctrines. Jones v. Graham, 36 Ark. 383 (1880) (decision under prior law).

Although not specifically enumerated in this section, an appellate court had jurisdiction over a request to exhume a body because the decedent's personal representative petitioned the probate division of the circuit court, during administration of the decedent's estate, to enforce a provision in the decedent's will by ordering exhumation and reburial and probate orders were appealable pursuant to §28-1-116(a) and Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 2(a)(12).Long v. Alford, 2010 Ark. App. 233, 374 S.W.3d 219 (2010).

A probate court had no jurisdiction of a claim by an attorney for services in prosecution of claim in behalf of an estate. Pike v. Thomas, 62 Ark. 223, 35 S.W. 212 (1896); Parker & Parker v. Mayo, 72 Ark. 513, 83 S.W. 324 (1904) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to audit claim against administrator for heirs' attorney's fee. Paget v. Brogan, 67 Ark. 522, 55 S.W. 938 (1900) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts could authorize the employment of counsel by the administrator and could allow fees for such services rendered as necessary expenses of administration. Paget v. Brogan, 67 Ark. 522, 55 S.W. 938 (1900) (decision under prior law).

Where the term at which fees of an attorney and a guardian had been ordered was allowed to lapse, the executor could not have an order allowing the fees set aside except by filing a petition which complied with the requirements of former Arkansas Statutes Annotated §§ 29-506 and 29-508. Hobbs v. Dowds, 233 Ark. 501, 345 S.W.2d 925 (1961).

A probate court was without jurisdiction to decide the ownership of jewelry claimed as a gift inter vivos from the testator. Huff v. Hot Springs Savs., Trust & Guar. Co., 185 Ark. 20, 45 S.W.2d 508 (1932) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had jurisdiction to order sale of decedent's homestead. Huffstedler v. Kibler, 67 Ark. 239, 54 S.W. 210 (1899) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction of an action by a widow against the heirs of her deceased husband to recover a homestead of which they were in adverse possession. James v. James, 72 Ark. 329, 80 S.W. 148 (1904) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had only such jurisdiction as was conferred by statute and the Arkansas Constitution. Lewis v. Rutherford, 71 Ark. 218, 72 S.W. 373 (1903) (decision under prior law).

The jurisdiction of probate courts was limited in its general scope as to the subject matter to the undisputed property of decedents and of wards, and, as to persons, to those interested in such property as equitably or legally entitled to some distributive share therein, or in the residue, and as to creditors who voluntarily, upon general notice and without special citation, present their claims. Huff v. Hot Springs Savs., Trust & Guar. Co., 185 Ark. 20, 45 S.W.2d 508 (1932) (decision under prior law).

The probate court is a court of special and limited jurisdiction, having only such jurisdiction and powers as are conferred by the constitution or by statute, or necessarily incidental to the exercise of the jurisdiction and powers specifically granted. Carpenter v. Logan, 281 Ark. 184, 662 S.W.2d 808 (1984).

Lost or destroyed wills are generally established by an action in chancery, but probate court has additional jurisdiction in matters of heirship, adoption, and, concurrent with jurisdiction of other courts, jurisdiction to restore lost wills and for the construction of wills when incident to the administration of an estate. Conkle v. Walker, 294 Ark. 222, 742 S.W.2d 892 (1988).

Neither the Arkansas Constitution nor this section confers on probate courts jurisdiction to administer a trust created by a will. Clement v. Larkey, 314 Ark. 488A, 314 Ark. 498, 863 S.W.2d 578 (1993).

The construction, interpretation, and operation of trusts are matters within the jurisdiction of the courts of equity; neither the Arkansas Constitution nor this section confers on probate courts jurisdiction to administer a trust created by a will. Long Trust v. Holk, 315 Ark. 112, 864 S.W.2d 869 (1993).

The probate court had subject matter jurisdiction to determine title to the real property where the appellant was a beneficiary of the testator's will, even though appellant was not acting in that capacity by asserting her claim to this property. Williams ex rel. Tucker v. Titterington, 46 Ark. App. 322, 881 S.W.2d 226 (1994).

Generally speaking, lost or destroyed wills are established by an action in chancery under §28-40-301; however, subdivision (a)(6) of this section grants probate court jurisdiction (concurrent with the jurisdiction other courts) over the restoration of lost wills and for the construction of wills when incident to the administration of an estate. Gilbert v. Gilbert, 47 Ark. App. 37, 883 S.W.2d 859 (1994).

Trial court erred in awarding a law firm an attorney's fee of $11,902.47 as the claim was barred by res judicata as: (1) in a first suit, the firm was denied relief for breach of contract and quantum meruit; (2) Ark. Const. Amend. 80 granted the trial court jurisdiction to rule on all claims of relief, legal and equitable; (3) jurisdiction was proper in the first suit under this section, and the first suit fully and finally settled all issues between the firm and the clients; and (4) both suits involved the same parties, and the same claims.Hooten v. Mobley Law Firm, P.A., 2011 Ark. App. 778, 387 S.W.3d 298 (2011).

A probate court could render summary judgment on an administrator's bond for the payment of assets found to be in his hands and which it had ordered to be paid over. Planters' Mut. Ins. Ass'n v. Harris, 96 Ark. 222, 131 S.W. 949 (1910) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had jurisdiction to set aside administrator's sale and to remove administrator. Hall v. Cox, 104 Ark. 303, 149 S.W. 80 (1912) (decision under prior law).

The jurisdiction of the probate court over the estates of deceased persons was held to be confined to the administration of assets which came under its control and, incidentally, to compel the discovery of assets. Shane v. Dickson, 111 Ark. 353, 163 S.W. 1140 (1914) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had jurisdiction to require an executor to disclose assets of the estate, including what, if anything, he owed the estate on notes or otherwise and to require him to charge himself with any amount he may have wrongfully paid to himself or to others without presenting the claim to the court for allowance. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 937, 160 S.W.2d 194 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Probate court did not have jurisdiction over suit by administrator of the estate to collect a debt alleged to be due to the estate by the defendant, where defendant was not an heir, distributee, or beneficiary, and was a third person or stranger to the estate. Estate of Puddy v. Gillam, 785 S.W.2d 254 (1990).

A probate court had jurisdiction to determine whether or not creditors had, by laches, lost the right to subject the real estate of the decedent to the payment of their debts. Brogan v. Brogan, 63 Ark. 405, 39 S.W. 58 (1897) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to establish a lost will. Waggener v. Lyles, 29 Ark. 47 (1874) (decision under prior law).

Jurisdiction was proper in probate court where the proceedings were to restore a lost will incident to the administration of an estate. Gilbert v. Gilbert, 47 Ark. App. 37, 883 S.W.2d 859 (1994).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to adjust the partnership accounts between deceased and surviving partners. However, where the accounts had been settled and a balance struck against a deceased partner, the probate court could render judgment for this balance against the estate. Culley & Son v. Edwards, 44 Ark. 423 (1884). See also Morris v. Stroude, 123 Ark. 313, 185 S.W. 451 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Where sole purpose of action is to establish paternity, the probate court is without jurisdiction to hear the matter. In re Estate of F.C., 321 Ark. 191, 900 S.W.2d 200 (1995).

Where a probate judge dismissed a petition for an accounting filed by an executor and a third party complaint filed by the widow and the dismissals were without prejudice to have the matters heard in the chancery court, the dismissals were not clearly erroneous, since the chancery court had the power to give an accounting even though it could have been had in the probate court where the matter was pending. Stokes v. Stokes, 275 Ark. 110, 628 S.W.2d 6 (1982).

In action by devisee for possession of motel devised to her for life against executors of will, the probate court of the county was court of competent jurisdiction to hear and determine the question of possession where the property was located in the county and ancillary administration of deceased's estate was being conducted there under the supervision of the probate court. Sides v. Haynes, 181 F. Supp. 889 (W.D. Ark. 1960).

The enactment of the Probate Code did not enlarge the jurisdiction of probate courts to hear contests over property rights between the personal representative and third persons. Hilburn v. First State Bank, 259 Ark. 569, 535 S.W.2d 810 (1976).

The probate courts have no jurisdiction to resolve disputes as to property rights between a personal representative and third persons claiming adversely to the estate; persons who are neither heirs, devisees, distributees, nor beneficiaries of the estate are third persons and “strangers” within the meaning of this rule. Williams ex rel. Tucker v. Titterington, 46 Ark. App. 322, 881 S.W.2d 226 (1994).

Under §28-49-101 real property is an asset in the hands of the administrator only when the probate court finds that it should be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged for purposes stated in §28-51-103. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979).

Probate court had no jurisdiction to adjudicate a claim by a widow against the administrator of her husband's estate for rents due her which were collected by the administrator. Mobley v. Andrews, 55 Ark. 222, 17 S.W. 805 (1891) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts had jurisdiction to order the sale of real estate to pay the debts of an estate in accordance with the jurisdiction conferred by this section. Sullivan v. Times Publishing Co., 181 Ark. 27, 24 S.W.2d 865 (1930) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no jurisdiction to try title to real property. Fancher v. Kenner, 110 Ark. 117, 161 S.W. 166 (1913); Fowler v. Frazier, 116 Ark. 350, 172 S.W. 875 (1915); Moss v. Moose, 184 Ark. 798, 44 S.W.2d 825 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Since nothing is said about unborn children in Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 34, concerning probate courts or in this section, which is the statutory jurisdictional provision, any attempt to extend the Probate Code to unborn children would be without specific authority and would be void. Accordingly, a probate court is correct in refusing to grant letters of administration to a deceased fetus. Carpenter v. Logan, 281 Ark. 184, 662 S.W.2d 808 (1984).

A probate court was without jurisdiction to vacate its judgment probating a will, such judgment being final. Dunn v. Bradley, 175 Ark. 182, 299 S.W. 370 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Ozment v. Mann, 235 Ark. 901, 363 S.W.2d 129 (1962); Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975); McDermott v. McAdams, 273 Ark. 20, 616 S.W.2d 476 (1981); Hutton v. Savage, 298 Ark. 256, 769 S.W.2d 394 (1989); Hall v. Superior Fed. Bank, 303 Ark. 125, 794 S.W.2d 611 (1990); In re D.J.M., 39 Ark. App. 116, 839 S.W.2d 535 (1992); Schenebeck v. Schenebeck, 329 Ark. 198, 947 S.W.2d 367 (1997); Judkins v. Hoover, 351 Ark. 552, 95 S.W.3d 768 (2003).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the jurisdiction of probate judges, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 269. The section was derived from Acts 1949, No. 140, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2004.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2004, 62-2005; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 268.

Partnership Accounts.

28-1-105. [Repealed.]

Circuit courts shall have the authority to appoint referees in probate in the respective counties in the manner and with the powers and duties as provided by Supreme Court rule.

In the absence of the circuit judge or a referee within a county, the probate clerk of the circuit court may appoint administrators, executors, guardians, and curators and shall approve the bond of the appointees.

However, the appointment of administrators, executors, guardians, and curators and the approval of their bond shall be subject to review by the court.

The probate clerk of the circuit court shall be the custodian of all probate records and documents and shall have the power either in person or by deputy to:

Take acknowledgments;

Administer oaths;

Issue notices and process;

Certify copies of instruments, documents, and records of the court; and

Perform the usual functions of his or her office and other functions as may be authorized by law.

All original papers, when filed, shall be retained in the custody of the clerk except when otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The probate clerk of the circuit court shall be the custodian of all adoption records and documents.

Cross References. Probate clerk to notify Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration of appointment, §26-59-120.

Ark. L. Rev.

Amendments of the Probate Code, 7 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

This section does not prohibit the judge in a special action from receiving documents in open court, without the intervention of the clerk of court and with the receipt of the documents constituting their “filing.” Orlando v. Wizel, 443 F. Supp. 744 (W.D. Ark. 1978).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning court reporters, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 271. The section was derived from Acts 1949, No. 140, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2014.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 6, 8; 1953, No. 165, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2006, 62-2008; Acts 1993, No. 758, § 1; 2003, No. 1185, § 270.

28-1-107. [Repealed.]

The following records of the court shall be maintained:

An index in which files pertaining to estates of deceased persons shall be indexed under the name of the decedent, and those pertaining to guardianships under the name of the ward. The file and docket number shall be shown after the name of each file;

A docket in which shall be listed in chronological order under the name of the decedent or ward all documents filed or issued and all orders made pertaining to the estate, including:

The dates thereof;

The names and addresses of fiduciaries and of attorneys for parties in interest when and as known to the clerk;

Reference to the volume and page of any record which shall have been made of the document or order; and

Other data as the court may direct;

A record of wills, properly indexed, in which shall be recorded all wills admitted to probate with the certificate of probate thereof;

Other records as may be required by law or the court.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 9; 1983, No. 250, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2009.